Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles
31-3-17.1.
Courtesy plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall design and issue under regulations that he or she deems appropriate, special courtesy automobile, motorcycle, and commercial registration plates to be used on passenger motor vehicles, motorcycles, and all commercial vehicles whose gross weight is not more than nine thousand pounds (9,000 lbs.) in lieu of other number plates. Special plates shall be of such design and shall bear such letters or combinations of letters and numbers as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall prescribe, and shall be made of light-reflecting sheeting applied on a metal base, provided that no automobile set of plates shall contain more than six (6) letters and numbers in a combination of letters and numbers, or less than two (2) letters, and that no motorcycle plate shall contain more than five (5) letters or more than five (5) letters and numbers in a combination or less than two (2) letters, and that a commercial courtesy plate shall be marked “commercial,” and shall contain no more than six (6) letters or more than six (6) letters and numbers in a combination or less than two (2) letters, and provided further, that there shall be no duplication of identification and the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, in his or her discretion, refuse to issue any letter or combination of letters and numbers that might carry connotations offensive to good taste and decency. A special automobile or commercial courtesy plate shall be issued upon application using forms furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, and upon payment, in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, a service charge of sixty dollars ($60.00) for each issue and for each registration renewal. For motorcycles, a special courtesy plate shall be issued upon application using forms furnished by the division of motor vehicles, and upon payment, in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, a service charge of thirty-four dollars ($34.00) for each issue and for each registration renewal. The service charge shall be paid to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles prior to the administrator’s acceptance of the application. The Rhode Island state lottery commission shall not be required to pay the service charge for any special courtesy plate issued pursuant to this section for motor vehicles owned or used by the lottery commission, and may utilize the special courtesy plates on all types of vehicles owned or operated by the lottery commission.

For any vehicle that is registered in accordance with §

31-1-3(a)

, the division of motor vehicles may also issue or approve, subject to rules and regulations that may be promulgated by the administrator, a courtesy registration plate in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 559, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2012, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 249, § 1.

31-3-17.2.
Civil defense plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may issue to the civil defense preparedness director of each city and town, for as long as such person remains a civil defense preparedness director, a special identifying number plate in place of any regular number plate assigned to each director at the time of the registration of a motor vehicle. The number shall be in numerical sequence preceded by the words “civil defense” or some similar appropriate designation, and the numbers shall be issued to the directors in alphabetical order according to the names of their respective city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 212, § 1.

31-3-17.3.
Temporary plates.

The administrator of motor vehicles may design and issue, under such regulations as he or she shall deem appropriate, temporary registration plates. Any vehicle issued a temporary plate may be operated on the public highways for a period of five (5) days from the date of issuance.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall design and issue, under such regulations as he or she shall deem appropriate, temporary registration plates to be issued by horse trailer dealers for the use on horse trailers. Any horse trailer issued a temporary plate may be operated on the public highways for a period of twenty (20) days from the date of issuance.

Temporary plates shall be issued at a charge of ten dollars ($10.00) per plate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 29, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 122, § 1.

31-3-17.4.
Firefighter plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to make available to all active firefighters and retired firefighters a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile, or commercial vehicle having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less, or vehicle eligible for a combination registration plate, pursuant to §

31-3-64

.

The special motor vehicle registration plate shall carry on it the designation “Firefighter” and a Maltese cross with the design provided by the Rhode Island Association of Fire Chiefs.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon payment of a service charge of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate, of which fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be deposited to the division of motor vehicles manufacturing account.

For the purpose of this section, an active or retired member of any fire department shall be defined as any person certified by the chief of the fire department as currently a member of said department with at least one year active service or retired under honorable condition as a firefighter.

In a state of emergency, any active member of a fire department driving a vehicle bearing the special motor vehicle registration plate shall be authorized and empowered to travel upon the highways of the state notwithstanding any driving ban imposed by the state or municipal authority in accordance with their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 605, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 394, § 1.

31-3-18.
Display of plates — Penalties.

Registration plates issued for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, trailer, transporter vehicle, in-transit vehicle, or a bailee engaged in a business as defined in §

31-1-17(a)

, or other than a motor vehicle owned by a duly authorized dealer in motor vehicles and which is used in the dealer’s business shall be attached thereto one in the front and the other in the rear. The registration plate issued for a motorcycle, trailer, bailee, or a dealer’s motor vehicle as defined in this subsection shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle.

Every registration plate shall at all times be securely fastened in a horizontal position to the vehicle for which it is issued so as to prevent the plate from swinging at a height of not less than twelve inches (12") from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate; in a place and position to be clearly visible and shall be maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legible.

Penalties. Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a violation and subject to a fine as enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

All vehicles registered as passenger, commercial, trailer, motorcycle, suburban, farm, combination, taxi, radio operator, camper, public, racer tow, jitney, and antique must have displayed on them the registration plate(s) as described in §

31-3-11

. This subsection does not apply to those registrants in possession of an alternative design plate as described in §

31-3-60

or any other specially authorized plate described in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 9, G.L. 1956, §

31-3-18

; P.L. 1968, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 108, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 56; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 261, § 1.

Applicability.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 19 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect July 1, 2008, and shall apply to all offenses committed on July 1, 2008 and thereafter.

31-3-19.
Registration of race cars.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue a special registration certificate and marker for any motor vehicle constructed to be used for racing, and that must be towed over the public highways to and from such places where those vehicles are to be raced; however, these motor vehicles shall be equipped with adequate brakes and a rear light that shows a red light to the rear and also provides a source of white light to illuminate the rear number plate or marker. The fee for this registration shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00), and the registration shall expire March 31st following the date of issue. The registration plate or marker issued for this motor vehicle shall, in addition to the number assigned, bear a symbol to indicate that the vehicle is to be towed while on the public highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2299, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-19

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 4.

31-3-20.
Operation with manufacturer’s or dealer’s plates.

A manufacturer or dealer owning any vehicle of a type otherwise required to be registered under this chapter, or any bona fide employee of a manufacturer or dealer, or any other appropriate persons as defined by this chapter, or by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter, may operate or move the vehicle upon the highways for any purpose without registering the vehicle upon condition that the vehicle has displayed on it, in the manner prescribed in §

31-3-18

, a special plate issued to the owner as provided in §§

31-3-23

—

31-3-25

.

Any manufacturer or dealer may loan a motor vehicle, the special plates, or both to any person for the purpose of demonstration of a motor vehicle, when a motor vehicle owned by the person is undergoing repairs, or when the person has purchased a motor vehicle the registration of which by him or her is pending, and in any case for not more than twenty (20) days in any year, provided the person operating the loaned motor vehicle or a motor vehicle bearing such loaned number plate shall furnish proof to the dealer or manufacturer that he or she has liability and property damage insurance which will cover any damage to any person or property caused by the operation of the loaned vehicle for which the operator would have been liable if he or she had also been the owner. This proof of insurance shall be set forth on a form to be obtained from the division of motor vehicles and the form shall be subject to any conditions that the division of motor vehicles may impose; provided that, in the event the person loaned the vehicle does not have an insurance policy in effect, then any liability or property damage shall be covered by the dealer’s insurance policy.

Any manufacturer or dealer may also loan a motor vehicle, under the circumstances outlined in this section, and the vehicle may be affixed plates belonging to the person operating the loaned motor vehicle when the number plates would be of the same classification. The dealer may issue a temporary certificate of registration of the vehicle and the vehicle may be operated upon the public highways under this certificate for a period of twenty (20) days from the date of issuance. The certificate shall be issued on a form obtained from the division of motor vehicles and shall be issued under any conditions that the division of motor vehicles may impose. The certificate shall be carried in the vehicle for which it is issued and the operator or person in control of the vehicle shall display the certificate for examination upon demand of any proper officer. Any damage to any person or property caused by the operation of the loaned vehicle shall be the responsibility of the operator or person in control of the vehicle and the dealer or manufacturer shall be in no way liable for it.

Every manufacturer or dealer shall keep a record of each loaned vehicle or number plate showing the date loaned, date returned, and the name and operator’s license number of the person operating any loaned vehicle or vehicle with the loaned number plates. This record shall be available during business hours for examination by any police officer or inspector designated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. Any licensed dealer or manufacturer may operate or cause to be operated by a bona fide employee a motor vehicle for his or her personal use and for use in connection with his or her business as a dealer or repairer for any length of time, provided that the dealer’s insurance policy shall at all times cover the motor vehicle while in use by the employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-20

; P.L. 1964, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 437, § 2.

31-3-20.1.
Operation with auto body repair shop plates.

An auto body repair shop, officially licensed by the department of business regulations, may loan a motor vehicle to a client/customer whose registered motor vehicle is undergoing auto body repair on the premises of the respective auto body repair shop, and may affix to the loaned motor vehicle number plates registered to the motor vehicle undergoing auto body repair when the number plates are of the same classification. The licensed auto body repair shop may issue a temporary certificate of registration to the loaned motor vehicle under which the loaned vehicle may be operated upon the public highways for a period of twenty (20) days from the date of issuance. The certificate shall be issued on a form obtained from the division of motor vehicles and shall be titled “agreement — temporary loan of motor vehicle”.

The certificate shall be issued under any conditions that the division of motor vehicles may impose. The certificate shall be carried in the loaned vehicle for which it is issued and the operator or person in control of the loaned vehicle shall display the certificate for examination upon demand of any proper officer. The client/customer shall furnish proof to the auto body repair shop that he or she has liability and property damage insurance which will cover any damage to any person or property caused by the operation of the loaned vehicle for which the client/customer would have been liable if he or she had been the owner.

This proof of insurance shall be set forth on the certificate issued by the division of motor vehicles and shall be subject to any conditions that the division of motor vehicles may impose. In the event the client/customer to whom the vehicle is loaned shall not have proper insurance in effect, then any liability or property damage shall be covered by the auto body repair shop’s insurance policy. Section

31-47-12(d)

shall apply to loaned motor vehicles, and the acceptable evidence of financial responsibility as filed in the rules and regulations relative to compulsory insurance or financial responsibility shall apply.

An auto body repair shop may not extend the use of “agreement — temporary loan of motor vehicle” certificates to anyone who is not a client/customer whose registered motor vehicle is undergoing auto body repair on the premises of the respective auto body repair shop. This legislation does not apply to any motor vehicle owned by a dealer, manufacturer, or operator of an auto body repair shop which is rented or leased for compensation to any person for any purpose.

Every auto body repair shop shall keep a record of each loaned vehicle showing the date loaned, date returned, name, address, and operator’s license number of the client/customer, the number plate transferred to the loaned vehicle, and the number of the certificate issued. This record shall be available during business hours for examination by any police officer or inspector designated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. This legislation does not apply to any motor vehicle owned by a dealer, manufacturer, or operator of an auto body repair shop which is rented or leased for compensation to any person for any purpose.

Penalties. Any owner and/or employee of any auto body repair shop or customer who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a violation and subject to a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) and have the authority to issue “agreement — temporary loan of motor vehicle” certificates revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 373, § 1.

31-3-21.
Use of bailee, transporter, and in transit plates.

A bailee may operate or move any vehicle of a type otherwise required to be registered under this chapter upon the highways solely for the purpose of delivery, upon displaying on the vehicle the plates issued to him or her as provided in §§

31-3-23

—

31-3-25

.

In transit plates may be used to operate or move special mobile equipment upon the highways solely for the purpose of moving that equipment to and from the location of any type of construction.

A transporter may operate or move any vehicle of a type otherwise required to be registered under this chapter upon the highway solely for the purpose of delivering, upon displaying on the vehicle the plates issued to him or her as provided in §§

31-3-23

—

31-3-25

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-21

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 189, § 2.

31-3-22.
Service vehicles owned by dealer.

The provisions of §§

31-3-20

—

31-3-27

shall not apply to work or service vehicles owned by a manufacturer, bailee, transporter, or dealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-22

; P.L. 1966, ch. 189, § 3.

31-3-23.
Application for dealer’s plates.

Any manufacturer, bailee, transporter, or dealer may apply to the division of motor vehicles on the appropriate form to obtain a certificate containing a general distinguishing number and for one or more special plates as appropriate to various types of vehicles subject to registration pursuant to this chapter. The applicant shall also submit proof of his or her status as a bona fide manufacturer, bailee, transporter, or dealer as may reasonably be required by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-23

; P.L. 1966, ch. 189, § 4; P.L. 1968, ch. 103, § 2.

31-3-23.1.
Limitation on number of plates.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the motor vehicle dealers’ license commission shall limit the number of plates allowable to any dealer in accordance with the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, and the plates shall be issued by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles up to such limit upon application by the dealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 165, § 1.

31-3-24.
Dealer’s certificate.

The division of motor vehicles, upon granting any application shall issue to the applicant a certificate containing the applicant’s name and address and the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-24

.

31-3-25.
Issuance of dealer’s plates.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special “dealer’s plates” as applied for, which shall have displayed on them the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant. Each plate so issued shall also contain a number or symbol identifying the plate from every other plate bearing the same general distinguishing number. The division of motor vehicles shall issue dealer’s plates every three (3) years in clearly distinguishable colors, one color to be used by new vehicle dealers, another color for used vehicles dealers, and another color for transporter and bailee plates. The color for each category enumerated in this section shall be changed every three (3) years with the issuance of the plates, and vehicle identification devices will be provided annually.

The dealer plate issuance scheduled for January 1, 2017, shall be deferred until January 1, 2018 to coincide with the dealer license renewal cycle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-25

; P.L. 1968, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 356, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 409, § 2.

31-3-25.1.
Cost of dealer’s plates.

The cost for the annual issuance of the new plates shall be an additional one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per set per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 122, § 2.

31-3-25.2.
Issuance of motorcycle dealer’s plates.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special motorcycle dealer’s plates as applied for, which shall bear the following: “motorcycle dealer”. The provisions of this chapter regarding application for, and display of “dealer’s plates” shall apply to motorcycle dealer’s plates. The plates shall be issued annually at a charge of twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per plate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 22, § 1.

31-3-25.3.
Issuance of boat dealer’s plates.

The division of motor vehicles shall issue special boat dealer’s plates as applied for, which shall bear the following: “boat dealer”. The “boat dealer” plates shall be used only on boat trailers used by the boat dealer in the course of his or her business. With respect to trailers, the provisions of this chapter regarding application for, operation with, and display of “dealer’s plates” shall apply to boat dealer’s plates. Without limiting the general applicability of the preceding provisions, §§

31-3-40

and

31-4-3

shall apply to boat dealers with respect to trailers. The plates shall be issued annually at a charge of twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per plate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 325, § 1.

31-3-26.
Expiration of dealer’s plates.

Every special plate issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire at midnight on the thirty-first (31st) day of December of each year. A new plate or plates for the ensuing year may be obtained by the person to whom any expired plate or plates was issued by applying to the division of motor vehicles and paying the fee provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-26

; P.L. 1984, ch. 296, § 1.

31-3-27.
Responsibility for use of dealer’s plates.

Every manufacturer, bailee, transporter, or dealer shall be at all times fully responsible and aware as to the use of special plates and the identity of the vehicles to which they are attached, and shall make this information immediately available to any proper officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 6, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-27

; P.L. 1966, ch. 189, § 5.

31-3-28.
Rules and regulations as to plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and empowered to make, alter, or amend, such rules and regulations that he or she may deem necessary, pertaining to the use, size, design, color scheme, and the material to be used in the manufacture of the number plates to be displayed on automobiles, motor trucks, trailers, semi-trailers, or other motor vehicles, except that at the next general issuance and each subsequent issuance. To promote safety and to facilitate the identification of registration plate letters and numerals at night, the department of revenue shall require that all registration plates shall be treated with special materials so as to make the background fully reflective and the letters and numerals on them readable at night for a minimum distance of one hundred feet (100´) with other illumination. An additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) shall be payable upon the initial issuance of the above described illuminated plates.

All rules and regulations made under the provisions of this section shall, after being approved by the governor and published at least once in each county of the state, have the effect of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1302, §§ 1-3; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-28

; P.L. 1971, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 4.

31-3-29.
Licensing of tow cars and tow trucks.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall require that every tow car or tow truck shall be licensed with a special registration certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 10, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-29

.

31-3-30.
Accident chasing by tow trucks.

It shall be unlawful for any tow car or tow truck to be at the scene of a motor vehicle accident unless summoned by the participants in that accident or by the owners of the respective vehicles involved in that accident. Any owner of any tow car or tow truck or his or her duly authorized agent, if found guilty of violating the provisions of this section, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense and for any subsequent offense shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) and have his or her special registration certificate suspended by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles for such period as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 10, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-30

.

31-3-31.
Registration of farm vehicles.

Farm vehicles, as defined in §

31-1-8

, equipped with rubber tires while being used in farming and operated on highways shall be registered on a form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and shall be assigned a special number plate with a suitable symbol or letter indicating the usage of the farm vehicle.

The director of the department of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations for the inspection of farm vehicles.

Farm plates may not be utilized on: (1) Vehicles eligible for registration as private passenger automobiles; provided, however, that any vehicle eligible for registration as a private passenger and registered with farm plates prior to July 1, 2002, may continue to be registered with farm plates by the owner to whom the farm plates were issued; or (2) On any vehicle that is not a farm vehicle as defined in §

31-1-8

.

Farm plates may be displayed on vehicles used in the delivery of agricultural products produced by the farmer; however, farm plates shall not be displayed on vehicles used for deliveries by persons, as defined in §

31-1-17(g)

, that do not raise agricultural products.

Any farm vehicle, as defined in §

31-1-8

, that is not required to be registered and that is covered by an insurance policy applicable to farm property and operations and that includes liability coverage, shall be deemed to have liability insurance as required by §

31-3-3(c)

and to meet liability insurance requirements set forth in this title as long as such a policy is in effect. Documentation of such insurance, including the name of the carrier, policy, number, and effective date, may be required by the division for the registration of said vehicle and for the renewal of such registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 11, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-31

; P.L. 1984, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 404, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 399, § 1.

31-3-31.1.
Registration of street rods and custom vehicles.

Definition of terms:

A “street rod” means a motor vehicle that:

Is a 1948 or older vehicle; or the vehicle was manufactured after 1948 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1949; and

Has been altered from the manufacturer’s original design; or has a body constructed from nonoriginal materials.

The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate of title of a street rod vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of such vehicle resembles.

Registration fee and application for street rods shall be as follows:

For each such street rod, there shall be a one-time pre-registration surcharge of fifty dollars ($50.00) which said sum(s) shall be accumulated by the division of motor vehicles until such time as said sum reaches an aggregate of twenty-three thousand dollars ($23,000) whereupon said division is authorized to proceed with the ordering/manufacturing of plates as required by subsection (3) herein. In addition thereto, and from hence forth, there shall be paid regular registration fees required for standard passenger vehicles as determined by the division of motor vehicles.

In applying for registration of a street rod under this section, the owner of the street rod shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for which the application is made:

Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours, and similar uses; and

Will not be used for general daily transportation.

In addition to the certification required under paragraph (i) of this subsection, when applying for registration of a street rod, the new owner of the street rod shall provide proof acceptable to the administration that the street rod passed a safety inspection that has been approved by the administration in consultation with the street rod community in this state.

On registration of a vehicle under this section, the administration shall issue a special street rod vehicle registration plate of the size and design that the administration determines in consultation with the street rod community in this state.

Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this section.

A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from any statute that requires periodic vehicle inspections and from any statute that requires the use and inspection of emission controls.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 457, § 1.

31-3-31.2.
Custom vehicles — Definition — Registration and fees.

A custom vehicle means any motor vehicle that:

Is at least twenty-five (25) or more years old and of a model year after 1948; or was manufactured to resemble a vehicle twenty-five (25) years old and of a model year after 1948; and

Has been altered from the manufacturer’s original design; or has a body constructed from nonoriginal materials.

The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate of title of a custom vehicle shall be the model year and year of manufacture that the body of such vehicle resembles.

For each such custom vehicle, there shall be a one-time pre-registration surcharge of fifty dollars ($50.00) which said sum(s) shall be accumulated by the division of motor vehicles until such time as said sum reaches an aggregate of twenty-three thousand dollars ($23,000) whereupon said division is authorized to proceed with the ordering/manufacturing of plates as required by subsection (d) herein. In addition thereto, and from hence forth, there shall be paid regular registration fees required for standard passenger vehicles as determined by the division of motor vehicles.

In applying for registration of a custom vehicle under this section, the owner of the custom vehicle shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for which the application is made:

Will be maintained for occasional transportation, exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours, and similar uses; and

Will not be used for general daily transportation.

In addition to the certification required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, when applying for registration of a custom vehicle, the new owner of the custom vehicle shall provide proof acceptable to the administration that the custom vehicle passed a safety inspection that has been approved by the administration in consultation with the custom vehicle community in this state.

On registration of a vehicle under this section, the administration shall issue a special custom vehicle registration plate of the size and design that the administration determines in consultation with the custom vehicle community of this state.

Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of this state as a condition of sale in the year listed as the year of manufacture on the certificate of title, the presence of any specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this section.

A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from any statute that requires periodic vehicle inspections and from any statute that requires the use and inspections of emission controls.

Signal lamps and devices — Street rod vehicles and custom vehicles:

“Blue dot tail light” means a red lamp installed in the rear of a motor vehicle containing a blue or purple insert that is not more than one inch in diameter.

A street rod or custom vehicle may use blue dot tail lights for stop lamps, rear turning indicator lamps, rear hazard lamps, and rear reflectors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 457, § 1.

31-3-31.3.
Registration of specially constructed vehicles.

A “specially constructed vehicle” means every vehicle of a type that must be registered under chapters 3 through 9 of this title, but not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles.

Specially constructed vehicles shall be subject to the registration fees in §

31-6-1

.

Before a specially constructed vehicle can be registered, it must undergo an inspection by the division of motor vehicles to determine whether the vehicle was designed for and may be safely operated on public roads, and meets all necessary safety standards. Only those specially constructed vehicles that are deemed by the division of motor vehicles to be designed for use on public roads and meeting all necessary safety standards shall be registered. Specially constructed vehicles that are registered shall be subject to inspection pursuant to §

31-38-4

to ensure that the vehicle continues to meet all necessary safety standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 203, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 8, effective July 14, 2021.

31-3-32.
Expiration of registration.

Every vehicle registration under chapters 3 — 9 of this title and every registration card and registration plate issued under this chapter shall expire at midnight on the thirty-first (31st) day of March of each year, except that the director of the department of revenue, division of motor vehicles shall implement a staggered registration system and a staggered distribution system for fully reflective plates required to be on all vehicles pursuant to §

31-3-10

. Implementation of the staggered registration system and distribution system shall be by rules and regulations promulgated by the director of revenue, division of motor vehicles. Every registration card and registration plate issued to apportioned vehicles shall expire on the thirty-first (31st) day of May of each year. A fee for the initial issuance of fully reflective plates and each reissuance thereafter shall be charged in accordance with § 31-6-1(a). However, the requirements for the reissue of fully reflective plates shall apply only to those standard plates described in §

31-3-11

and not to plates authorized by any other section of the general or public laws. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-32

; P.L. 1979, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 56; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 103; P.L. 2002, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 4.

31-3-33.
Renewal of registration.

Application for renewal of a vehicle registration shall be made by the owner on a proper application form and by payment of the registration fee for the vehicle as provided by law.

The division of motor vehicles may receive applications for renewal of registration, and may grant the renewal and issue new registration cards and plates at any time prior to expiration of registration.

Upon renewal, owners will be issued a renewal sticker for each registration plate that shall be placed at the bottom, right-hand corner of the plate. Owners shall be issued a new, fully reflective plate beginning July 1, 2022, at the time of initial registration or at the renewal of an existing registration and reissuance will be conducted no less than every ten (10) years.

No later than August 15, 2019, and every fifteenth day of the month through August 15, 2020, the division of motor vehicles shall submit a report outlining the previous month’s activity and progress towards the implementation of the license plate reissuance to the chairpersons of the house finance and senate finance committee, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor. The report shall include, but not be limited to, information on the status of project plans, obstacles to implementation, and actions taken toward implementation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-33

; P.L. 1979, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 3, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

31-3-34.
Notice of change of address.

Whenever any person after applying for or obtaining the registration of a vehicle shall move from the address named in the application or shown upon a registration card, that person shall within ten (10) days subsequent to moving notify the division of motor vehicles in writing of his or her former and current addresses. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-34

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 103.

31-3-35.
Notice of change of name.

Whenever the name of any person who has applied for or obtained the registration of a vehicle is subsequently changed by marriage or otherwise, that person shall within ten (10) days notify the division of motor vehicles of the former and current names. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 3, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-3-35

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 103.